Georgia statutes. TITLE 18 Debtor and Creditor
CHAPTER 2 Debtor and Creditor Relations

Cross references.

Effect of new promise to pay a debt as reviving or extending original liability, §

9-3-110

et seq.

Right of debtor to direct claim to which payment to creditor shall be appropriated, §

13-4-42

.

Release generally,
§

13-4-80

et seq.

Accord and satisfaction, §

13-4-100

et seq.